Florida, session 2026, SB1080.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 161 162 Section 1.âThe Department of Transportation and any 163 impacted local government shall increase the minimum perception 164 reaction time for each steady yellow signal located at an 165 intersection equipped with a traffic infraction detector by 0.4 166 seconds. 167 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (9) of 168 section 316.008, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 169 316.008âPowers of local authorities.â 170 (9)(a)âA county or municipality may enforce the applicable 171 speed limit on a roadway properly maintained as a school zone 172 pursuant to s. 316.1895: 173 1.âWithin 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the 174 start of a regularly scheduled breakfast program; 175 2.âWithin 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the 176 start of a regularly scheduled school session; 177 3.âDuring the entirety of a regularly scheduled school 178 session; and 179 4.âWithin 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the 180 end of a regularly scheduled school session 181 182 through the use of a speed detection system for the detection of 183 speed and capturing of photographs or videos for violations in 184 excess of 10 miles per hour over the speed limit in force in the 185 school zone at the time of the violation. A school zoneâs 186 compliance with s. 316.1895 creates a rebuttable presumption 187 that the school zone is properly maintained. The restrictive 188 school zone speed limit may only be enforced through the use of 189 a speed detection system when any flashing beacon used to 190 provide notice of the restrictive school zone speed limit is 191 activated. For speed detection systems installed before July 1, 192 2026, capturing the beacon status in photographic or video 193 evidence or by other evidence is not required for proof of the 194 beacon status until January 1, 2028. An area maintained as a 195 school zone which has no beacon installed before July 1, 2026, 196 has until January 1, 2028, to place and install a beacon, and, 197 until a beacon is installed, the county or municipality may 198 provide proof of the school zone speed limit in force at the 199 time of violation without evidence of the beacon status. 200 (b)âA county or municipality may place or install, or 201 contract with a vendor to place or install, a speed detection 202 system within a roadway maintained as a school zone as provided 203 in s. 316.1895 to enforce unlawful speed limit violations in the 204 school zone, as specified in s. 316.1895 s. 316.1895(10) or s. 205 316.183, which are in excess of 10 miles per hour over the 206 school zone speed limit in force at the time of violation, on 207 that roadway. The physical placement of a speed detection system 208 may be outside the boundaries of the school zone but within the 209 roadway maintained as a school zone. Any notice of violation or 210 uniform traffic citation issued using a speed detection system 211 must be based solely on a violation occurring within the 212 boundaries of the school zone and during the times authorized 213 under this subsection. 214 Section 3.âPresent paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of 215 section 316.0083, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 216 (d), a new paragraph (c) is added to that subsection, and 217 paragraph (a) of subsection (1), subsection (2), and paragraph 218 (b) of subsection (4) of that section are amended, to read: 219 316.0083âMark Wandall Traffic Safety Program; 220 administration; report.â 221 (1)(a)âFor purposes of administering this section, the 222 department, a county, or a municipality may authorize a traffic 223 infraction enforcement officer under s. 316.640 to issue a 224 traffic citation for a violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 225 316.075(1)(c)1. A notice of violation and a traffic citation may 226 not be issued for failure to stop at a red light if the driver 227 is making a right-hand turn in a careful and prudent manner at 228 an intersection where right-hand turns are permissible. A notice 229 of violation and a traffic citation may not be issued under this 230 section if the driver of the vehicle came to a complete stop 231 after crossing the stop line and before turning right if 232 permissible at a red light, but failed to stop before crossing 233 over the stop line or other point at which a stop is required. 234 This paragraph does not prohibit a review of information from a 235 traffic infraction detector by an authorized employee or agent 236 of the department, a county, or a municipality before issuance 237 of the traffic citation by the traffic infraction enforcement 238 officer. This paragraph does not prohibit the department, a 239 county, or a municipality from issuing notification as provided 240 in paragraph (b) to the registered owner of the motor vehicle 241 involved in the violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. 242 (2)âA notice of violation and a traffic citation may not be 243 issued for failure to stop at a red light if the driver is 244 making a right-hand turn in a careful and prudent manner at an 245 intersection where right-hand turns are permissible. For 246 purposes of this subsection, the term âcareful and prudent 247 mannerâ means that the driver made a right-hand turn after 248 coming to a complete stop and, in the traffic enforcement 249 officerâs determination, yielded to any pedestrian or bicyclist 250 and did not place a pedestrian or bicyclist in danger of injury 251 as a result of the right-hand turn, yielded to any other 252 vehicle, and substantially reduced the speed of the motor 253 vehicle before making the right-hand turn. 254 (4) 255 (b)âEach county or municipality that operates a traffic 256 infraction detector shall submit a report by October 1, 257 annually, to the department which details the results of using 258 the traffic infraction detector and the procedures for 259 enforcement for the preceding state fiscal year. The information 260 submitted by the counties and municipalities must include: 261 1.âThe number of notices of violation issued, the number 262 that were contested, the number that were upheld, the number 263 that were dismissed, the number that were issued as uniform 264 traffic citations, the number that were paid, and the number in 265 each of the preceding categories for which the notice of 266 violation was issued for a right-hand turn violation. 267 2.âA description of alternative safety countermeasures 268 taken before and after the placement or installation of a 269 traffic infraction detector. 270 3.âStatistical data and information required by the 271 department to complete the summary report required under 272 paragraph (d) (c). 273 274 The department must publish each report submitted by a county or 275 municipality pursuant to this paragraph on its website. 276 (c)âEach county or municipality that operates a traffic 277 infraction detector is responsible for and shall maintain its 278 respective data for reporting purposes under this subsection for 279 at least 2 years after such data is reported to the department. 280 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 316.0776, Florida 281 Statutes, is amended to read: 282 316.0776âTraffic infraction detectors; speed detection 283 systems; placement and installation.â 284 (3)âA speed detection system authorized by s. 316.008(9) 285 may be placed or installed anywhere in an area maintained, as 286 defined in s. 316.1895(3)(d), as a school zone on a state road 287 when permitted by the Department of Transportation and in 288 accordance with placement and installation specifications 289 developed by the Department of Transportation. The speed 290 detection system may be placed or installed anywhere in an area 291 maintained, as defined in s. 316.1895(3)(d), as a school zone on 292 a street or highway under the jurisdiction of a county or a 293 municipality in accordance with placement and installation 294 specifications established by the Department of Transportation. 295 The placement and installation specifications must allow the 296 placement of a speed detection system or components thereof 297 outside the boundaries of the school zone but within the area 298 maintained as a school zone. The speed detection system may only 299 capture violations occurring within the school zone and during 300 the times authorized under s. 316.008(9), regardless of the 301 placement of the speed detection system or its components The 302 Department of Transportation must establish such placement and 303 installation specifications by December 31, 2023. 304 (a)âIf a county or municipality places or installs a speed 305 detection system as authorized by s. 316.008(9), the county or 306 municipality must notify the public that a speed detection 307 system may be in use by posting signage indicating photographic 308 or video enforcement of the school zone speed limits. Such 309 signage shall clearly designate the time period during which the 310 school zone speed limits are enforced using a speed detection 311 system and must meet the placement and installation 312 specifications established by the Department of Transportation. 313 For a speed detection system enforcing violations of s. 316.1895 314 or s. 316.183 on a roadway maintained as a school zone, this 315 paragraph governs the signage notifying the public of the use of 316 a speed detection system. 317 (b)âIf a county or municipality begins a school zone speed 318 detection system program in a county or municipality that has 319 never conducted such a program, the respective county or 320 municipality must make a public announcement and conduct a 321 public awareness campaign of the proposed use of speed detection 322 systems at least 30 days before commencing enforcement under the 323 speed detection system program and must notify the public of the 324 specific date on which the program will commence. During the 30 325 day public awareness campaign, only a warning may be issued to 326 the registered owner of a motor vehicle for a violation of s. 327 316.1895 or s. 316.183 enforced by a speed detection system, and 328 liability may not be imposed for the civil penalty under s. 329 318.18(3)(d). 330 (c)âA county or municipality that operates one or more 331 school zone speed detection systems must annually report the 332 results of all systems within the countyâs or municipalityâs 333 jurisdiction by placing the report required under s. 334 316.1896(16)(a) as a single reporting item on the agenda of a 335 regular or special meeting of the countyâs or municipalityâs 336 governing body. Before a county or municipality contracts or 337 renews a contract to place or install a speed detection system 338 in a school zone pursuant to s. 316.008(9), the county or 339 municipality must approve the contract or contract renewal at a 340 regular or special meeting of the countyâs or municipalityâs 341 governing body. 342 1.âInterested members of the public must be allowed to 343 comment regarding the report, contract, or contract renewal 344 under the countyâs or municipalityâs public comment policies or 345 formats, and the report, contract, or contract renewal may not 346 be considered as part of a consent agenda. 347 2.âThe report required under this paragraph must include a 348 written summary, which must be read aloud at the regular or 349 special meeting, and the summary must contain, for the same time 350 period pertaining to the annual report to the department under 351 s. 316.1896(16)(a), the number of notices of violation issued, 352 the number that were contested, the number that were upheld, the 353 number that were dismissed, the number that were issued as 354 uniform traffic citations, and the number that were paid and how 355 collected funds were distributed and in what amounts. The county 356 or municipality must report to the department that the countyâs 357 or municipalityâs annual report was considered in accordance 358 with this paragraph, including the date of the regular or 359 special meeting at which the annual report was considered. 360 3.âThe compliance or sufficiency of compliance with this 361 paragraph may not be raised in a proceeding challenging a 362 violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 enforced by a speed 363 detection system in a school zone. 364 Section 5.âEffective October 1, 2026, present subsections 365 (3), (4), and (5) of section 316.0777, Florida Statutes, are 366 redesignated as subsections (4), (5), and (6), respectively, and 367 a new subsection (3) and subsection (7) are added to that 368 section, to read: 369 316.0777âAutomated license plate recognition systems; 370 installation within rights-of-way of State Highway System and on 371 and within property owned or controlled by private entity; 372 public records exemption.â 373 (3)âA private property owner may install an automated 374 license plate recognition system solely for use on and within 375 the property owned or controlled by the property owner. A 376 private property owner that installs or directs the installation 377 of such a system: 378 (a)âMay not access vehicle registration or title data for 379 vehicles identified by the system, unless the private property 380 owner is acting to the extent permitted by the Driverâs Privacy 381 Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. ss. 2721-2725, or for the limited 382 purpose of providing notice to vehicle owners that they failed 383 to pay for parking and that such failure has resulted in a 384 parking charge pursuant to s. 715.075. 385 (b)âMay not share or sell images, personal identifying 386 information, vehicle identification numbers or license plate 387 numbers, or any data that could be reasonably connected to an 388 individual collected or generated by the system, except: 389 1.âTo the extent required to respond to a lawful request 390 from a criminal justice agency; 391 2.âTo the extent required to control or enforce access to 392 the property or for parking enforcement; 393 3.âTo the extent sharing such information is necessary to 394 report suspicious activity or suspected criminal activity to a 395 criminal justice agency; or 396 4.âTo the extent permitted by the Driverâs Privacy 397 Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. ss. 2721-2725. 398 (c)âMust contractually obligate any third party that 399 installs, maintains, or operates the system or receives 400 information pursuant to subparagraph (b)2. to protect the images 401 or data collected or generated by the system from disclosure, 402 including a prohibition on sharing or selling such images or 403 data, except to the extent authorized under paragraph (b). 404 (d)âMust implement, and must contractually obligate any 405 third party that installs, maintains, or operates the system or 406 receives information pursuant to subparagraph (b)2. to 407 implement, all of the following: 408 1.âIndustry-recognized encryption protocols to ensure that 409 images and associated data collected or generated by the system 410 are encrypted in transmission and at rest. 411 2.âAn auditable access control system that records access 412 to images and associated data. 413 3.âA data retention schedule that provides for deletion of 414 images and data no later than 30 days after the images or data 415 is collected or generated by the system, except to the extent 416 needed to comply with a court order or subpoena, comply with the 417 appeal process provided in s. 715.075(1)(c) and (d), or collect 418 an unpaid invoice for parking enforcement. Records detailing 419 disclosure logs or transaction information may be retained 420 longer in accordance with federal law. 421 (e)âMay not offer or provide as payment or other 422 consideration any portion of the proceeds derived from a fine or 423 charge imposed based on images or data collected or generated by 424 the system to any third party that installs, maintains, or 425 operates the system, except to the extent that the fine or 426 violation is issued in connection with controlling or enforcing 427 access to such property or for parking enforcement. 428 (7)âA person who uses or releases information in violation 429 of this section commits a noncriminal infraction, punishable by 430 a fine not exceeding $2,000. 431 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6), paragraph (a) 432 of subsection (17), and paragraph (a) of subsection (18) of 433 section 316.173, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 434 316.173âSchool bus infraction detection systems.â 435 (6) 436 (b)âProcedures for an administrative hearing conducted 437 under this subsection are as follows: 438 1.âThe department shall make available electronically to 439 the school district or its designee or the county a Request for 440 Hearing form to assist each district or county with 441 administering this subsection. 442 2.âThe school district shall assign existing staff to serve 443 as the clerk to the local hearing officer. A person, referred to 444 in this paragraph as the petitioner, who elects to request a 445 hearing under this subsection shall be scheduled for a hearing 446 by the clerk to the local hearing officer. The hearing may be 447 conducted either virtually via live video conferencing or in 448 person. 449 3.âWithin 120 days after receipt of a timely request for a 450 hearing, the law enforcement agency or its designee shall 451 provide a replica of the notice of violation data to the school 452 district or county by manual or electronic transmission, and 453 thereafter the school district or its designee or the county 454 shall mail a notice of hearing, which shall include a hearing 455 date and may at the discretion of the district or county include 456 virtual and in-person hearing options, to the petitioner by 457 first-class mail. Mailing of the notice of hearing constitutes 458 notification. Upon receipt of the notice of hearing, the 459 petitioner may reschedule the hearing up to two times once by 460 submitting a written request to the local hearing officer at 461 least 5 calendar days before the day of the originally scheduled 462 hearing. The petitioner may cancel his or her hearing by paying 463 the penalty assessed in the notice of violation. 464 4.âAll testimony at the hearing shall be under oath. The 465 local hearing officer shall take testimony from a representative 466 of the law enforcement agency and the petitioner, and may take 467 testimony from others. The local hearing officer shall review 468 the video and images recorded by a school bus infraction 469 detection system. Formal rules of evidence do not apply, but due 470 process shall be observed and govern the proceedings. 471 5.âAt the conclusion of the hearing, the local hearing 472 officer shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence 473 whether a violation has occurred and shall uphold or dismiss the 474 violation. The local hearing officer shall issue a final 475 administrative order including the determination and, if the 476 notice of violation is upheld, require the petitioner to pay the 477 civil penalty previously assessed in the notice of violation, 478 and may shall also require the petitioner to pay costs, not to 479 exceed those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to be used by the 480 county for operational costs relating to the hearing process or 481 by the school district for technology and operational costs 482 relating to the hearing process as well as school transportation 483 safety-related initiatives. The final administrative order shall 484 be mailed to the petitioner by first-class mail. 485 6.âAn aggrieved party may appeal a final administrative 486 order consistent with the process provided in s. 162.11. 487 (17)(a)1.âA school bus infraction detection system may not 488 be used for remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a 489 school bus infraction detection system to enforce violations of 490 s. 316.172 does not constitute remote surveillance. 491 2.âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, video and 492 images recorded as part of a school bus infraction detection 493 system may only be used for traffic enforcement and for purposes 494 of determining criminal or civil liability for incidents 495 captured by the school bus infraction detection system 496 incidental to the permissible use of the school bus infraction 497 detection system. 498 3.âTo the extent practicable, a school bus infraction 499 detection system must use necessary technology to ensure that 500 personal identifying information contained in the video or still 501 images recorded by the system which is not relevant to the 502 alleged violation, including, but not limited to, the identity 503 of the driver and any passenger of a motor vehicle, the interior 504 or contents of a motor vehicle, the identity of an uninvolved 505 person, a number identifying the address of a private residence, 506 and the contents or interior of a private residence, is 507 sufficiently obscured so as not to reveal such personal 508 identifying information. 509 4.âA notice of a violation or uniform traffic citation 510 issued under this section may not be dismissed solely because a 511 recorded video or still images reveal personal identifying 512 information as provided in subparagraph 3. as long as a 513 reasonable effort has been made to comply with this subsection. 514 (18)(a)âBy October 1, annually 2023, and quarterly 515 thereafter, each school district operating a school bus 516 infraction detection system must submit, in consultation with 517 the law enforcement agencies with which it has interlocal 518 agreements pursuant to this section, a report to the department 519 which details the results of the school bus infraction detection 520 systems in the school district in the preceding state fiscal 521 year. The department shall publish each report on its website 522 quarter. The information from the school districts must be 523 submitted in a form and manner determined by the department, 524 which the department must make available to the school districts 525 by August 1, 2023, and must include at least the following: 526 1.âThe number of school buses that have a school bus 527 infraction detection system installed, including the date of 528 installation and, if applicable, the date the systems were 529 removed. 530 2.âThe number of notices of violations issued, the number 531 that were contested, the number that were upheld, the number 532 that were dismissed, the number that were issued as uniform 533 traffic citations, and the number that were paid. 534 3.âData for each infraction to determine locations in need 535 of safety improvements. Such data may include, but is not 536 limited to, global positioning system coordinates of the 537 infraction, the date and time of the infraction, and the name of 538 the school that the school bus was transporting students to or 539 from. 540 4.âAny other statistical data and information required by 541 the department to complete the report required by paragraph (c). 542 Section 7.âSubsection (2) of section 316.183, Florida 543 Statutes, is amended to read: 544 316.183âUnlawful speed.â 545 (2)âOn all streets or highways, the maximum speed limits 546 for all vehicles must be 30 miles per hour in business or 547 residence districts, and 55 miles per hour at any time at all 548 other locations. However, with respect to a residence district, 549 a county or municipality may set a lower maximum speed limit of 550 20 or 25 miles per hour on local streets and highways after an 551 investigation determines that such a limit is reasonable. It is 552 not necessary to conduct a separate investigation for each 553 residence district. The minimum speed limit on all highways that 554 comprise a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense 555 Highways and have not fewer than four lanes is 40 miles per 556 hour, except that when the posted speed limit is 70 miles per 557 hour, the minimum speed limit is 50 miles per hour. 558 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 559 316.189, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 560 316.189âEstablishment of municipal and county speed zones.â 561 (2)âSPEED ON COUNTY ROADS.âThe maximum speed on any county 562 maintained road is: 563 (a)âIn any business or residence district, 30 miles per 564 hour in the daytime or nighttime; provided that with respect to 565 residence districts a county may set a lower maximum speed limit 566 of 25 miles per hour after an investigation determines that such 567 a limit is reasonable; and it shall not be necessary to conduct 568 a separate investigation in each residence district. 569 570 However, the board of county commissioners may set speed zones 571 altering such speeds, both as to maximum and minimum, after 572 investigation determines such a change is reasonable and in 573 conformity to criteria promulgated by the Department of 574 Transportation, except that no such speed zone shall permit a 575 speed of more than 60 miles per hour. 576 Section 9.âSubsection (6) of section 316.1895, Florida 577 Statutes, is amended to read: 578 316.1895âEstablishment of school speed zones, enforcement; 579 designation.â 580 (6)âPermanent signs designating school zones and school 581 zone speed limits shall be uniform in size and color, and shall 582 have the times during which the restrictive school zone speed 583 limit is enforced clearly designated thereon. Flashing beacons 584 activated by a time clock, or other automatic device, or 585 manually activated may be used as an alternative to posting the 586 times during which the restrictive school zone speed limit is 587 enforced. However, if a restrictive school zone speed limit is 588 enforced through a speed detection system as provided in s. 589 316.1896, the school zone and restrictive school zone speed 590 limit must be designated using flashing beacons. An area 591 maintained as a school zone that has no flashing beacon 592 installed before July 1, 2026, has until January 1, 2028, to 593 place and install a beacon. Beginning July 1, 2008, for any 594 newly established school zone or any school zone in which the 595 signing has been replaced, a sign stating âSpeeding Fines 596 Doubledâ shall be installed within the school zone. The 597 Department of Transportation shall establish adequate standards 598 for the signs and flashing beacons. 599 Section 10.âSubsections (1), (2), (3), (6), and (8), 600 paragraph (a) of subsection (15), and paragraph (a) of 601 subsection (16) of section 316.1896, Florida Statutes, are 602 amended to read: 603 316.1896âRoadways maintained as school zones; speed 604 detection system enforcement; penalties; appeal procedure; 605 privacy; reports.â 606 (1)âFor purposes of administering this section, a county or 607 municipality may authorize a traffic infraction enforcement 608 officer under s. 316.640 to issue uniform traffic citations for 609 violations of ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 as authorized by s. 610 316.008(9), as follows: 611 (a)âFor a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles 612 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30 613 minutes before through 30 minutes after the start of a regularly 614 scheduled breakfast program. 615 (b)âFor a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles 616 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30 617 minutes before through 30 minutes after the start of a regularly 618 scheduled school session. 619 (c)âFor a violation of s. 316.183 in excess of 10 miles per 620 hour over the posted speed limit during the entirety of a 621 regularly scheduled school session. 622 (d)âFor a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles 623 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30 624 minutes before through 30 minutes after the end of a regularly 625 scheduled school session. 626 627 Such violation must be evidenced by a speed detection system 628 described in ss. 316.008(9) and 316.0776(3). This subsection 629 does not prohibit a review of information from a speed detection 630 system by an authorized employee or agent of a county or 631 municipality before issuance of the uniform traffic citation by 632 the traffic infraction enforcement officer. This subsection does 633 not prohibit a county or municipality from issuing notices as 634 provided in subsection (2) to the registered owner of the motor 635 vehicle for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183. The 636 restrictive school zone speed limit may only be enforced through 637 the use of a speed detection system when any flashing beacon 638 used to provide notice of the restrictive school zone speed 639 limit is activated. For speed detection systems installed before 640 July 1, 2026, capturing the beacon status in photographic or 641 video evidence or by other evidence is not required for proof of 642 the beacon status until January 1, 2028. An area maintained as a 643 school zone which has no beacon installed before July 1, 2026, 644 has until January 1, 2028, to place and install a beacon, and, 645 until the beacon is installed, the county or municipality may 646 provide proof of the school zone speed limit in force at the 647 time of violation without evidence of the beacon status. 648 (2)âWithin 30 days after a violation, notice must be sent 649 to the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the 650 violation specifying the remedies available under s. 318.14 and 651 that the violator must pay the penalty under s. 318.18(3)(d) to 652 the county or municipality, or furnish an affidavit in 653 accordance with subsection (8), within 60 30 days after the date 654 of the notice of violation in order to avoid court fees, costs, 655 and the issuance of a uniform traffic citation. The notice of 656 violation must: 657 (a)âBe sent by first-class mail. 658 (b)âInclude a photograph or other recorded image showing 659 the license plate of the motor vehicle; the date, time, and 660 location of the violation; the maximum speed at which the motor 661 vehicle was traveling within the school zone; and the speed 662 limit within the school zone at the time of the violation. 663 (c)âInclude a notice that the owner has the right to 664 review, in person or remotely, the photograph or video captured 665 by the speed detection system and the evidence of the speed of 666 the motor vehicle detected by the speed detection system which 667 constitute a rebuttable presumption that the motor vehicle was 668 used in violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183. 669 (d)âState the time when, and the place or website at which, 670 the photograph or video captured and evidence of speed detected 671 may be examined and observed. 672 (3)âNotwithstanding any other law, a person who receives a 673 notice of violation under this section may request a hearing 674 within 60 30 days after the notice of violation or may pay the 675 penalty pursuant to the notice of violation, but a payment or 676 fee may not be required before the hearing requested by the 677 person. The notice of violation must be accompanied by, or 678 direct the person to a website that provides, information on the 679 personâs right to request a hearing and on all costs related 680 thereto and a form used for requesting a hearing. As used in 681 this subsection, the term âpersonâ includes a natural person, 682 the registered owner or co-owner of a motor vehicle, or the 683 person identified in an affidavit as having actual care, 684 custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the 685 violation. 686 (6)âA uniform traffic citation must be issued by mailing 687 the uniform traffic citation by certified mail to the address of 688 the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the 689 violation if payment has not been made within 60 30 days after 690 notification under subsection (2), if the registered owner has 691 not requested a hearing as authorized under subsection (3), and 692 if the registered owner has not submitted an affidavit in 693 accordance with subsection (8). 694 (a)âDelivery of the uniform traffic citation constitutes 695 notification of a violation under this subsection. If the 696 registered owner or co-owner of the motor vehicle; the person 697 identified as having care, custody, or control of the motor 698 vehicle at the time of the violation; or a duly authorized 699 representative of the owner, co-owner, or identified person 700 initiates a proceeding to challenge the citation pursuant to 701 this section, such person waives any challenge or dispute as to 702 the delivery of the uniform traffic citation. 703 (b)âIn the case of joint ownership of a motor vehicle, the 704 uniform traffic citation must be mailed to the first name 705 appearing on the motor vehicle registration, unless the first 706 name appearing on the registration is a business organization, 707 in which case the second name appearing on the registration may 708 be used. 709 (c)âThe uniform traffic citation mailed to the registered 710 owner of the motor vehicle involved in the infraction must be 711 accompanied by the information described in paragraphs (2)(b) 712 (d). 713 (8)âTo establish such facts under subsection (7), the 714 registered owner of the motor vehicle must, within 60 30 days 715 after the date of issuance of the notice of violation or the 716 uniform traffic citation, furnish to the appropriate 717 governmental entity an affidavit setting forth information 718 supporting an exception under subsection (7). 719 (a)âAn affidavit supporting the exception under paragraph 720 (7)(a) must include the name, address, date of birth, and, if 721 known, the driver license number of the person who leased, 722 rented, or otherwise had care, custody, or control of the motor 723 vehicle at the time of the alleged violation. If the motor 724 vehicle was stolen at the time of the alleged violation, the 725 affidavit must include the police report indicating that the 726 motor vehicle was stolen. 727 (b)âIf a uniform traffic citation for a violation of s. 728 316.1895 or s. 316.183 was issued at the location of the 729 violation by a law enforcement officer, the affidavit must 730 include the serial number of the uniform traffic citation. 731 (c)âIf the motor vehicleâs owner to whom a notice of 732 violation or a uniform traffic citation has been issued is 733 deceased, the affidavit must include a certified copy of the 734 ownerâs death certificate showing that the date of death 735 occurred on or before the date of the alleged violation and one 736 of the following: 737 1.âA bill of sale or other document showing that the 738 deceased ownerâs motor vehicle was sold or transferred after his 739 or her death but on or before the date of the alleged violation. 740 2.âDocumented proof that the registered license plate 741 belonging to the deceased ownerâs motor vehicle was returned to 742 the department or any branch office or authorized agent of the 743 department after his or her death but on or before the date of 744 the alleged violation. 745 3.âA copy of the police report showing that the deceased 746 ownerâs registered license plate or motor vehicle was stolen 747 after his or her death but on or before the date of the alleged 748 violation. 749 750 Upon receipt of the affidavit and documentation required under 751 paragraphs (b) and (c), or 60 30 days after the date of issuance 752 of a notice of violation sent to a person identified as having 753 care, custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of 754 the violation under paragraph (a), the county or municipality 755 must dismiss the notice or citation and provide proof of such 756 dismissal to the person who submitted the affidavit. If, within 757 30 days after the date of a notice of violation sent to a person 758 under subsection (9), the county or municipality receives an 759 affidavit under subsection (10) from the person sent a notice of 760 violation affirming that the person did not have care, custody, 761 or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, 762 the county or municipality must notify the registered owner that 763 the notice or citation will not be dismissed due to failure to 764 establish that another person had care, custody, or control of 765 the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. 766 (15)(a)âA speed detection system in a school zone may not 767 be used for remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a 768 speed detection system to enforce violations of ss. 316.1895 and 769 316.183, or user-controlled pan or tilt adjustments of speed 770 detection system components, do not constitute remote 771 surveillance. Notwithstanding any other law, recorded video or 772 photographs collected as part of a speed detection system in a 773 school zone may only be used to document violations of ss. 774 316.1895 and 316.183 and for purposes of determining criminal or 775 civil liability for incidents captured by the speed detection 776 system incidental to the permissible use of the speed detection 777 system. 778 (16)(a)âEach county or municipality that operates one or 779 more speed detection systems shall must submit a report by 780 October 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, to the department 781 which identifies the public safety objectives used to identify a 782 school zone for enforcement under this section, reports 783 compliance with s. 316.0776(3)(c), and details the results of 784 the speed detection system in the school zone during the 785 preceding state fiscal year and the procedures for enforcement. 786 The information from counties and municipalities must be 787 submitted in a form and manner determined by the department, 788 which the department must make available to the counties and 789 municipalities by August 1, 2023, and the department may require 790 data components to be submitted quarterly. The report must 791 include at least the following: 792 1.âInformation related to the location of each speed 793 detection system, including the geocoordinates of the school 794 zone, the directional approach of the speed detection system, 795 the school name, the school level, the times the speed detection 796 system was active, the restrictive restricted school zone speed 797 limit enforced pursuant to s. 316.1895(5), the posted speed 798 limit enforced at times other than those authorized by s. 799 316.1895(5), the date the systems were activated to enforce 800 violations of ss. 316.1895 and 316.183, and, if applicable, the 801 date the systems were deactivated. 802 2.âThe number of notices of violation issued, the number, 803 if any, that were issued outside of the enforcement periods 804 authorized in subsection (1), the number that were contested, 805 the number that were upheld, the number that were dismissed, the 806 number that were issued as uniform traffic citations, and the 807 number that were paid. 808 3.âAny other statistical data and information related to 809 the procedures for enforcement which is required by the 810 department to complete the report required under paragraph (c). 811 812 The department must publish each report submitted by a county or 813 municipality pursuant to this paragraph on its website. 814 Section 11.âSubsection (3) of section 316.1906, Florida 815 Statutes, is amended to read: 816 316.1906âRadar speed-measuring devices; speed detection 817 systems; evidence, admissibility.â 818 (3)âA speed detection system is exempt from the design 819 requirements for radar or LiDAR units established by the 820 department, and the radar or LiDAR units used in the speed 821 detection system are not required to be on any approved list of 822 the department. A speed detection system must have the ability 823 to perform self-tests as to its detection accuracy. The system 824 must perform a self-test at least once every 30 days. The law 825 enforcement agency, or an agent acting on behalf of the law 826 enforcement agency, operating a speed detection system must 827 maintain a log of the results of the systemâs self-tests. The 828 law enforcement agency, or an agent acting on behalf of the law 829 enforcement agency, operating a speed detection system must also 830 perform an independent calibration test on the speed detection 831 system at least once every 12 months. The self-test logs, as 832 well as the results of the annual calibration test, are 833 admissible in any court proceeding for a uniform traffic 834 citation issued for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 835 enforced pursuant to s. 316.1896. Notwithstanding subsection 836 (2), evidence of the speed of a motor vehicle detected by a 837 speed detection system compliant with this subsection and the 838 determination by a traffic enforcement officer that a motor 839 vehicle is operating in excess of the applicable speed limit is 840 admissible in any proceeding with respect to an alleged 841 violation of law regulating the speed of motor vehicles in 842 school zones. 843 Section 12.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 844 316.650, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 845 316.650âTraffic citations.â 846 (3) 847 (c)âIf a traffic citation is issued under s. 316.0083 or s. 848 316.1896, the traffic infraction enforcement officer, or, if the 849 citation is issued under s. 316.173, the law enforcement 850 officer, must shall provide by electronic transmission a replica 851 of the traffic citation data to the court having jurisdiction 852 over the alleged offense or its traffic violations bureau within 853 5 business days after the date of issuance of the traffic 854 citation to the violator. If a hearing is requested, the traffic 855 infraction enforcement officer or law enforcement officer, as 856 applicable, must shall provide a replica of the traffic notice 857 of violation data to the clerk to for the local hearing officer 858 having jurisdiction over the alleged offense within 14 days. 859 Section 13.âSubsection (3) of section 318.15, Florida 860 Statutes, is amended to read: 861 318.15âFailure to comply with civil penalty or to appear; 862 penalty.â 863 (3)âThe clerk of the court or the clerk to the local 864 hearing officer shall notify the department of persons who were 865 mailed a notice of violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 866 316.075(1)(c)1. pursuant to s. 316.0083, s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b) 867 pursuant to s. 316.173, or s. 316.183 or s. 316.1895(10) 868 pursuant to s. 316.1896 and who failed to enter into, or comply 869 with the terms of, a penalty payment plan, or order with the 870 clerk to the local hearing officer or failed to appear at a 871 scheduled hearing within 10 days after such failure, and shall 872 reference the personâs driver license number, or in the case of 873 a business entity, vehicle registration number. 874 (a)âUpon receipt of such notice, the department, or 875 authorized agent thereof, may not issue a license plate or 876 revalidation sticker for any motor vehicle owned or co-owned by 877 that person pursuant to s. 320.03(8) until the amounts assessed 878 have been fully paid. 879 (b)âAfter the issuance of the personâs license plate or 880 revalidation sticker is withheld pursuant to paragraph (a), the 881 person may challenge the withholding of the license plate or 882 revalidation sticker only on the basis that the outstanding 883 fines and civil penalties have been paid pursuant to s. 884 320.03(8). 885 Section 14.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (5) 886 and subsection (23) of section 318.18, Florida Statutes, are 887 amended to read: 888 318.18âAmount of penalties.âThe penalties required for a 889 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal 890 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows: 891 (5)(a)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2., $200 for a 892 violation of s. 316.172(1)(a), failure to stop for a school bus. 893 If, at a hearing, the alleged offender is found to have 894 committed this offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil 895 penalty of $200. In addition to this penalty, for a second or 896 subsequent offense within a period of 5 years, the department 897 shall suspend the driver license of the person for not less than 898 180 days and not more than 1 year. 899 2.âIf a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) is enforced by a 900 school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 316.173, 901 the penalty of $200 shall be imposed. If, at an administrative 902 hearing contesting a notice of violation or uniform traffic 903 citation, the alleged offender is found to have committed this 904 offense, a minimum civil penalty of $200 shall be imposed. 905 Notwithstanding any other provision of law except s. 28.37(6), 906 the civil penalties assessed under this subparagraph resulting 907 from a notice of violation or uniform traffic citation shall be 908 remitted to the school district at least monthly and used 909 pursuant to s. 316.173(8). 910 (b)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2., $400 for a 911 violation of s. 316.172(1)(b), passing a school bus on the side 912 that children enter and exit when the school bus displays a stop 913 signal. If, at a hearing, the alleged offender is found to have 914 committed this offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil 915 penalty of $400. 916 2.âIf a violation of s. 316.172(1)(b) is enforced by a 917 school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 316.173, 918 the penalty under this subparagraph is a minimum of $200. If, at 919 a hearing contesting a notice of violation or uniform traffic 920 citation, the alleged offender is found to have committed this 921 offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil penalty of $200. 922 Notwithstanding any other provision of law except s. 28.37(6), 923 the civil penalties assessed under this subparagraph resulting 924 from notice of violation or uniform traffic citation shall be 925 remitted to the school district at least monthly and used 926 pursuant to s. 316.173(8). 927 3.âIn addition to this penalty, for a second or subsequent 928 offense within a period of 5 years, the department shall suspend 929 the driver license of the person for not less than 360 days and 930 not more than 2 years. 931 (c)1.âIn addition to the penalty under subparagraph (a)2. 932 or subparagraph (b)2., if, at an administrative hearing 933 contesting a notice of violation, the alleged offender is found 934 to have committed this offense, costs shall be imposed, not to 935 exceed those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to be paid by the 936 petitioner and to be used by the county for the operational 937 costs related to the hearing or the school district for 938 technology and operational costs relating to the hearing as well 939 as school transportation safety-related initiatives. 940 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a countyâs local 941 hearing officer administers the administrative hearing process 942 for a contested notice of violation, the costs imposed under 943 this subparagraph resulting from notice of violation shall be 944 remitted to the county at least monthly. 945 2.âIn addition to the penalty under paragraph (a) or 946 paragraph (b), $65 for a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b). 947 If the alleged offender is found to have committed the offense, 948 the court shall impose the civil penalty under paragraph (a) or 949 paragraph (b) plus an additional $65. The additional $65 950 collected under this subparagraph shall be remitted to the 951 Department of Revenue for deposit into the Emergency Medical 952 Services Trust Fund of the Department of Health to be used as 953 provided in s. 395.4036. If a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or 954 (b) is enforced by a school bus infraction detection system 955 pursuant to s. 316.173, an the additional civil penalty amount 956 imposed on a notice of violation, on a uniform traffic citation, 957 or by the court under this paragraph must be $25, in lieu of the 958 additional $65, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, 959 the additional civil penalties and additional costs must be 960 remitted to the participating school district at least monthly 961 and used pursuant to s. 316.173(8). 962 (23)âIn addition to the penalty prescribed under s. 963 316.0083, s. 316.173, s. 316.183, s. 316.1895, or s. 316.1896 964 for violations enforced under those sections s. 316.0083 which 965 are upheld by the local hearing officer, the local hearing 966 officer may also order the payment of county, or municipal, or 967 school district costs, not to exceed $250. 968 Section 15.âSubsection (12) of section 320.02, Florida 969 Statutes, is amended to read: 970 320.02âRegistration required; application for registration; 971 forms.â 972 (12)âThe department is authorized to withhold registration 973 or reregistration of any motor vehicle if the owner, or one of 974 the co-owners of the vehicle:, 975 (a)âHas a driver license which is under suspension for the 976 failure to remit payment of any fines levied in this state 977 pursuant to chapter 318 or chapter 322; or 978 (b)âReceived a traffic citation for a violation of s. 979 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. as enforced by s. 316.0083, s. 980 316.172(1)(a) or (b) as enforced by s. 316.173, or s. 316.183 or 981 s. 316.1895(10) as enforced by s. 316.1896 and did not request a 982 hearing, submit an affidavit claiming an exception, or pay the 983 traffic citation. 984 Section 16.âSection 320.061, Florida Statutes, is amended 985 to read: 986 320.061âUnlawful to alter motor vehicle registration 987 certificates, license plates, temporary license plates, mobile 988 home stickers, or validation stickers or to obscure license 989 plates; penalty.âA person may not alter the original appearance 990 of a vehicle registration certificate, license plate, temporary 991 license plate, mobile home sticker, or validation sticker issued 992 for and assigned to a motor vehicle or mobile home, whether by 993 mutilation, alteration, defacement, or change of color or in any 994 other manner. A person may not apply or attach a substance, 995 reflective matter, illuminated device, spray, coating, covering, 996 or other material onto or around any license plate which 997 interferes with the legibility, angular visibility, or 998 detectability of the primary features or details, including the 999 license plate number or validation sticker, any feature or 1000 detail on the license plate or interferes with the ability to 1001 record the primary features or details, including the license 1002 plate number or validation sticker, any feature or detail on the 1003 license plate. A license plate frame that impinges upon 1004 information located on the top or bottom of the license plate is 1005 permissible, as long as law enforcement can identify the state 1006 issuing the license plate. A person who knowingly violates this 1007 section commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable 1008 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1009 Section 17.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1010 320.0848, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (a) of 1011 subsection (1) of that section, as amended by section 5 of 1012 chapter 2025-125, Laws of Florida, is republished, to read: 1013 320.0848âPersons who have disabilities; issuance of 1014 disabled parking permits; temporary permits; permits for certain 1015 providers of transportation services to persons who have 1016 disabilities.â 1017 (1)(a)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1018 or its authorized agents shall, upon application and receipt of 1019 the fee: 1020 1.âIssue a disabled parking permit for a period of up to 4 1021 years, which period ends on the applicantâs birthday, to any 1022 person who has long-term mobility impairment; 1023 2.âIssue a temporary disabled parking permit for up to 6 1024 months to a person who has a temporary mobility impairment; or 1025 3.âIssue a lifetime disabled parking permit to a person who 1026 is certified as permanently disabled due to permanent 1027 dismemberment or an amputation and is in need of the disabled 1028 parking permit due to that permanent dismemberment or 1029 amputation. A lifetime disabled parking permit is valid from the 1030 date of issuance until the personâs death and is not subject to 1031 renewal under paragraph (d). 1032 1033 A person is not required to pay a fee for a parking permit for 1034 disabled persons more than once in a 12-month period from the 1035 date of the prior fee payment. 1036 (b)1.âThe person must be currently certified as being 1037 legally blind or as having any of the following disabilities 1038 that render him or her unable to walk 200 feet without stopping 1039 to rest: 1040 a.âInability to walk without the use of or assistance from 1041 a brace, cane, crutch, prosthetic device, or other assistive 1042 device, or without the assistance of another person. If the 1043 assistive device significantly restores the personâs ability to 1044 walk to the extent that the person can walk without severe 1045 limitation, the person is not eligible for the exemption parking 1046 permit. 1047 b.âThe need to permanently use a wheelchair. 1048 c.âRestriction by lung disease to the extent that the 1049 personâs forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for 1 second, 1050 when measured by spirometry, is less than 1 liter, or the 1051 personâs arterial oxygen is less than 60 mm/hg on room air at 1052 rest. 1053 d.âUse of portable oxygen. 1054 e.âRestriction by cardiac condition to the extent that the 1055 personâs functional limitations are classified in severity as 1056 Class III or Class IV according to standards set by the American 1057 Heart Association. 1058 f.âSevere limitation in the personâs ability to walk due to 1059 an arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition, including 1060 any pregnancy-related condition. 1061 2.âThe certification of disability which is required under 1062 subparagraph 1. must be provided by a physician licensed under 1063 chapter 458, chapter 459, or chapter 460, by a podiatric 1064 physician licensed under chapter 461, by an optometrist licensed 1065 under chapter 463, by an advanced practice registered nurse 1066 licensed under chapter 464 under the protocol of a licensed 1067 physician as stated in this subparagraph, by a physician 1068 assistant licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, or by a 1069 similarly licensed physician from another state if the 1070 application is accompanied by documentation of the physicianâs 1071 licensure in the other state and a form signed by the out-of 1072 state physician verifying his or her knowledge of this stateâs 1073 eligibility guidelines. 1074 Section 18.âSection 320.0849, Florida Statutes, is 1075 repealed. 1076 Section 19.âSubsection (4) of section 322.142, Florida 1077 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (5), (6), and (7) are 1078 added to that section, to read: 1079 322.142âColor photographic or digital imaged licenses.â 1080 (4)âThe department may maintain a film negative or print 1081 file. The department shall maintain a record of the digital 1082 image and signature of the licensees, together with other data 1083 required by the department for identification and retrieval. 1084 Reproductions from the file or digital record are exempt from 1085 the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and may be made and issued only: 1086 (a)âFor departmental administrative purposes; 1087 (b)âFor the issuance of duplicate licenses; 1088 (c)âFor identity verification by a state agency pursuant to 1089 an interagency agreement, subject to the licenseeâs consent; 1090 (d)âIn response to law enforcement agency requests; 1091 (e)(d)âTo the Department of Business and Professional 1092 Regulation and the Department of Health pursuant to an 1093 interagency agreement for the purpose of accessing digital 1094 images for reproduction of licenses issued by the Department of 1095 Business and Professional Regulation or the Department of 1096 Health; 1097 (f)(e)âTo the Department of State or a supervisor of 1098 elections pursuant to an interagency agreement to facilitate 1099 determinations of eligibility of voter registration applicants 1100 and registered voters in accordance with ss. 98.045 and 98.075; 1101 (g)(f)âTo the Department of Revenue pursuant to an 1102 interagency agreement for use in establishing paternity and 1103 establishing, modifying, or enforcing support obligations in 1104 Title IV-D cases; 1105 (h)(g)âTo the Department of Children and Families pursuant 1106 to an interagency agreement to conduct protective investigations 1107 under part III of chapter 39 and chapter 415; 1108 (i)(h)âTo the Department of Children and Families pursuant 1109 to an interagency agreement specifying the number of employees 1110 in each of that departmentâs regions to be granted access to the 1111 records for use as verification of identity to expedite the 1112 determination of eligibility for public assistance and for use 1113 in public assistance fraud investigations; 1114 (j)(i)âTo the Agency for Health Care Administration 1115 pursuant to an interagency agreement for the purpose of 1116 authorized agencies verifying photographs in the Care Provider 1117 Background Screening Clearinghouse authorized under s. 435.12; 1118 (k)(j)âTo the Department of Financial Services pursuant to 1119 an interagency agreement to facilitate the location of owners of 1120 unclaimed property, the validation of unclaimed property claims, 1121 the identification of fraudulent or false claims, and the 1122 investigation of allegations of violations of the insurance code 1123 by licensees and unlicensed persons; 1124 (l)(k)âTo the Department of Commerce pursuant to an 1125 interagency agreement to facilitate the validation of 1126 reemployment assistance claims and the identification of 1127 fraudulent or false reemployment assistance claims; 1128 (m)(l)âTo district medical examiners pursuant to an 1129 interagency agreement for the purpose of identifying a deceased 1130 individual, determining cause of death, and notifying next of 1131 kin of any investigations, including autopsies and other 1132 laboratory examinations, authorized in s. 406.11; 1133 (n)(m)âTo the following persons for the purpose of 1134 identifying a person as part of the official work of a court: 1135 1.âA justice or judge of this state; 1136 2.âAn employee of the state courts system who works in a 1137 position that is designated in writing for access by the Chief 1138 Justice of the Supreme Court or a chief judge of a district or 1139 circuit court, or by his or her designee; or 1140 3.âA government employee who performs functions on behalf 1141 of the state courts system in a position that is designated in 1142 writing for access by the Chief Justice or a chief judge, or by 1143 his or her designee; or 1144 (o)(n)âTo the Agency for Health Care Administration 1145 pursuant to an interagency agreement to prevent health care 1146 fraud. If the Agency for Health Care Administration enters into 1147 an agreement with a private entity to carry out duties relating 1148 to health care fraud prevention, such contracts shall include, 1149 but need not be limited to: 1150 1.âProvisions requiring internal controls and audit 1151 processes to identify access, use, and unauthorized access of 1152 information. 1153 2.âA requirement to report unauthorized access or use to 1154 the Agency for Health Care Administration within 1 business day 1155 after the discovery of the unauthorized access or use. 1156 3.âProvisions for liquidated damages for unauthorized 1157 access or use of no less than $5,000 per occurrence. 1158 (5)âAn identity verification service provider may use 1159 department data for the departmentâs or another agencyâs 1160 internal identity verification purposes in a manner consistent 1161 with this section only if such data remains in the possession of 1162 the department. 1163 (6)âAn identity verification service provider may not sell, 1164 share, or retain any information outside of the purposes of this 1165 section. 1166 (7)âThe department may not allow the use of digital imaged 1167 licenses for a private entityâs business purposes. 1168 Section 20.âSubsection (10) of section 332.007, Florida 1169 Statutes, is amended to read: 1170 332.007âAdministration and financing of aviation and 1171 airport programs and projects; state plan.â 1172 (10)âSubject to the availability of appropriated funds, and 1173 unless otherwise provided in the General Appropriations Act or 1174 the substantive bill implementing the General Appropriations 1175 Act, The department may fund up to 100 percent of eligible 1176 project costs of projects under this section all of the 1177 following at a public-use airport located in a rural community 1178 as defined in s. 288.0656 which does not have any scheduled 1179 commercial service. The department may not require matching 1180 funds for any eligible project at such airports located in rural 1181 areas of opportunity designated under s. 288.0656. Funds 1182 provided pursuant to this section may be provided as matching 1183 funds for eligible projects funded by the Federal Government or 1184 any state agency: 1185 (a)âThe capital cost of runway and taxiway projects that 1186 add capacity. Such projects must be prioritized based on the 1187 amount of available nonstate matching funds. 1188 (b)âEconomic development transportation projects pursuant 1189 to s. 339.2821. 1190 1191 Any remaining funds must be allocated for projects specified in 1192 subsection (6). 1193 Section 21.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (11) of 1194 section 337.11, Florida Statutes, to read: 1195 337.11âContracting authority of department; bids; emergency 1196 repairs, supplemental agreements, and change orders; combined 1197 design and construction contracts; progress payments; records; 1198 requirements of vehicle registration.â 1199 (11) 1200 (d)1.âThe department may make direct payments to a first 1201 tier subcontractor. Such payments do not create any enforceable 1202 third-party beneficiary rights. The department shall adopt by 1203 rule procedures to implement this paragraph. Such procedures 1204 must establish the circumstances under which such payments may 1205 be made and must include, at a minimum, all of the following: 1206 a.âThe contractor has not requested payment from the 1207 department for at least 6 months. 1208 b.âThere is a binding, written subcontract between the 1209 contractor and the subcontractor, and the department is in 1210 possession of a complete copy of the subcontract. 1211 c.âThe subcontractor has performed work that is unpaid by 1212 the contractor, and the department has sufficient documentation 1213 of such unpaid work. 1214 d.âThere is no legitimate dispute between the contractor 1215 and the subcontractor. 1216 e.âThe department has provided written notice to the 1217 payment and performance bond surety at least 30 days before 1218 releasing a payment under this paragraph, and the surety has not 1219 objected in writing within the 30-day period based on a 1220 documented dispute or claim regarding the unpaid work or 1221 payment. 1222 2.âAmounts paid by the department pursuant to rules adopted 1223 under this paragraph must be deducted from amounts otherwise due 1224 to the contractor. 1225 Section 22.âPresent subsection (6) of section 337.18, 1226 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a new 1227 subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 1228 337.18âSurety bonds for construction or maintenance 1229 contracts; requirement with respect to contract award; bond 1230 requirements; defaults; damage assessments.â 1231 (6)âIf the department and the surety enter into a takeover 1232 agreement, such agreement must set forth procedures regarding 1233 the suretyâs certification of disbursement of payment to 1234 subcontractors. 1235 Section 23.âParagraph (j) is added to subsection (6) of 1236 section 339.175, Florida Statutes, to read: 1237 339.175âMetropolitan planning organization.â 1238 (6)âPOWERS, DUTIES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES.âThe powers, 1239 privileges, and authority of an M.P.O. are those specified in 1240 this section or incorporated in an interlocal agreement 1241 authorized under s. 163.01. Each M.P.O. shall perform all acts 1242 required by federal or state laws or rules, now and subsequently 1243 applicable, which are necessary to qualify for federal aid. It 1244 is the intent of this section that each M.P.O. be involved in 1245 the planning and programming of transportation facilities, 1246 including, but not limited to, airports, intercity and high 1247 speed rail lines, seaports, and intermodal facilities, to the 1248 extent permitted by state or federal law. An M.P.O. may not 1249 perform project production or delivery for capital improvement 1250 projects on the State Highway System. 1251 (j)âBy December 31, 2026, the M.P.O.âs serving Charlotte, 1252 Collier, and Lee Counties must submit to the Governor, the 1253 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 1254 Representatives a feasibility report exploring the benefits, 1255 costs, and process of consolidation into a single M.P.O. serving 1256 the contiguous urbanized area, the goal of which is to: 1257 1.âCoordinate transportation projects deemed to be 1258 regionally significant. 1259 2.âReview the impact of regionally significant land use 1260 decisions on the region. 1261 3.âReview all proposed regionally significant 1262 transportation projects in the transportation improvement 1263 programs. 1264 Section 24.âSection 339.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1265 read: 1266 (Substantial rewording of section. See 1267 s. 339.85, F.S., for present text.) 1268 339.85âNext-generation Traffic Signal Modernization Grant 1269 Program.â 1270 (1)âThe department shall implement a Next-generation 1271 Traffic Signal Modernization Grant Program. The purpose of the 1272 program is to assist counties and municipalities in upgrading 1273 eligible signalized intersections with artificial intelligence- 1274 and machine learning-enabled detection, controllers, 1275 communications, and software that prioritize modernization in 1276 key corridors across this state. 1277 (2)(a)âThe department shall implement a state-local 1278 partnership through a cost-sharing arrangement as follows: 1279 1.âAuthorize the department to fund first-year pilot 1280 corridors at up to 80 percent of eligible costs, with a minimum 1281 20 percent local contribution. 1282 2.âAuthorize the department to fund 50 percent of ensuing 1283 year research and development and installation. 1284 (b)âOngoing maintenance after signal modernization shall be 1285 the responsibility of the local government and the vendor. 1286 (3)âThe department may waive any local match requirement 1287 for state-owned or state-operated intersections. 1288 (4)âThe department shall prioritize grant applications for 1289 intersections at which a signal modernization will measurably: 1290 (a)âReduce average control delay and corridor travel times. 1291 (b)âImprove surrogate safety measures, such as failures to 1292 stop at red lights and hard-braking events, and support 1293 emergency vehicle preemption. 1294 (c)âProvide transit signal priority and multimodal benefits 1295 to pedestrians and cyclists. 1296 (5)âThe department shall use competitive procurement as 1297 provided in chapter 287 to find a vendor or vendors that use 1298 state-of-the-art technology that complies with leading 1299 cybersecurity standards, such as SOC 2 and ISO 27001, ensuring 1300 robust data protection. Additionally, the program shall: 1301 (a)âRequire open, interoperable, and secure systems that 1302 avoid vendor lock-in and protect cybersecurity. 1303 (b)âEnsure data transparency through standardized 1304 performance dashboards and annual public reports demonstrating 1305 benefits relative to cost. 1306 (c)âCoordinate with metropolitan planning organizations, 1307 regional traffic management centers, and law enforcement, fire 1308 rescue, and transit agencies to maximize systemwide benefits. 1309 (d)âEncourage use of state-based pilots, sandboxes, and 1310 independent evaluations to validate performance before large 1311 scale rollout. 1312 (e)âSupport workforce development and local operations 1313 staff training so upgrades remain effective over the life of the 1314 equipment. 1315 (6)âBeginning in fiscal year 2026-2027, $20 million is 1316 appropriated annually from the State Transportation Trust Fund 1317 to the department to fund the Next-generation Traffic Signal 1318 Modernization Grant Program as described in this section. 1319 Section 25.âSubsection (23) is added to section 775.15, 1320 Florida Statutes, to read: 1321 775.15âTime limitations; general time limitations; 1322 exceptions.â 1323 (23)âFor a traffic citation enforced pursuant to s. 1324 316.0083, s. 316.173, s. 316.183, or s. 316.1896, the 1-year 1325 period of limitation for a noncriminal violation pursuant to 1326 paragraph (2)(d) is extended for 1 year upon receipt of an 1327 affidavit indicating that the motor vehicle was in the care, 1328 custody, or control of another person at the time of the 1329 violation, as authorized in s. 316.0083, s. 316.173, s. 316.183, 1330 or s. 316.1896, respectively. 1331 Section 26.âRailroad crossing safety technology study.â 1332 (1)(a)âThe Legislature finds that improving safety at 1333 railroad crossings is critical to protecting the lives of 1334 pedestrians, motorists, railway workers, and the general public. 1335 Advanced detection and monitoring systems using such 1336 technologies as sensors, high-resolution cameras, and data 1337 analytics may provide a reliable means to enhance situational 1338 awareness and reduce collisions at railroad crossings. 1339 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that additional analysis 1340 is necessary to evaluate the effectiveness, feasibility, costs, 1341 and implementation considerations of such systems. 1342 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to direct the 1343 Department of Transportation to study the technologies 1344 referenced in paragraph (a) before considering any statewide 1345 requirements for their deployment. 1346 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1347 (a)ââAdvanced detection and monitoring systemâ means a 1348 system capable of detecting and classifying objects, such as 1349 pedestrians, vehicles, or other obstructions at or approaching a 1350 railroad crossing, using technologies including, but not limited 1351 to, sensors, cameras, and data analytics. 1352 (b)ââPublic railroad-highway grade crossingâ has the same 1353 meaning as provided in s. 335.141(1)(b), Florida Statutes. 1354 (3)(a)âThe Department of Transportation shall conduct a 1355 statewide study on the use of advanced detection and monitoring 1356 systems at public railroad-highway grade crossings in this 1357 state. 1358 (b)âThe study must include, but is not limited to, an 1359 analysis of all of the following: 1360 1.âAvailable and emerging advanced detection and monitoring 1361 technologies applicable to railroad crossings. 1362 2.âThe effectiveness of such technologies in improving 1363 safety outcomes, including collision prevention and hazard 1364 mitigation, based on available data from pilot programs, 1365 deployments in other jurisdictions, or academic research. 1366 3.âTechnical and operational considerations, including 1367 interoperability with existing railroad safety systems and 1368 operating protocols. 1369 4.âCosts associated with the deployment of advanced 1370 detection and monitoring systems, including installation, 1371 operation, maintenance, and long-term lifecycle costs. 1372 5.âPotential funding mechanisms, including federal funds, 1373 state funds, grants, or public-private partnerships. 1374 6.âCriteria for identifying higher-risk railroad crossings 1375 where such technologies may provide the greatest safety benefit. 1376 7.âLegal, regulatory, and operational considerations 1377 related to the deployment and oversight of advanced detection 1378 and monitoring systems. 1379 8.âThe respective roles of the state, local governments, 1380 and railroad owners in the implementation of such systems. 1381 (4)âIn conducting the study, the department may consult 1382 with, as appropriate, any of the following: 1383 (a)âRailroad owners and railroad industry representatives. 1384 (b)âLocal governments with jurisdiction over public 1385 railroad-highway grade crossings. 1386 (c)âTransportation safety experts and academic 1387 institutions. 1388 (d)âFederal agencies or national organizations with 1389 expertise in railroad safety. 1390 (5)âBy December 1, 2026, the department shall submit a 1391 report of its findings and any recommendations to the Governor, 1392 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 1393 Representatives. The report may include policy recommendations 1394 for legislative consideration, but may not recommend or require 1395 the mandatory installation or upgrade of railroad crossings. 1396 Section 27.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1397 made by this act to section 318.18, Florida Statutes, in a 1398 reference thereto, section 318.121, Florida Statutes, is 1399 reenacted to read: 1400 318.121âPreemption of additional fees, fines, surcharges, 1401 and costs.âNotwithstanding any general or special law, or 1402 municipal or county ordinance, additional fees, fines, 1403 surcharges, or costs other than the court costs and surcharges 1404 assessed under s. 318.18(12), (14), (19), (20), and (23) may not 1405 be added to the civil traffic penalties assessed under this 1406 chapter. 1407 Section 28.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 1408 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.